District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.20

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 21, 32 DCR 919
1981 Ed., § 6-940.
This section is referenced in § 2-1226.40b.